dev/he.dix
    <pardef n="או/ון__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ון</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ננו</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכם</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכן</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נן</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נה</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נם</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נים</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניי</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נינו</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניך</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נייך</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניכם</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניכן</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניהן</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניו</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניה</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ניהם</l><r>ון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="פשד/ולק__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ולק</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולק</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקי</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקנו</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקך</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקך</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקכם</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקכן</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקן</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקו</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקה</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקם</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>לקים</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקי</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>לקיי</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>לקינו</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>לקיך</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>לקייך</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקיכם</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקיכן</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקיהן</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>לקיו</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>לקיה</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ולקיהם</l><r>ולק<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="מאווי/י__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ין</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהן</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהם</l><r>י<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="מאוויי"><i>מאווי</i><par n="מאווי/י__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אוון"><i>או</i><par n="או/ון__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פשדולק"><i>פשד</i><par n="פשד/ולק__n_m"/></e>
